Tennessee, session 114, SB1065.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SECTION 1. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 38-8-107, is amended by adding the
following new subsection:
(g)
(1) The commission shall also issue a certificate of compliance to any
person duly elected and sworn as a county constable; provided, that the person
meets the qualifications for employment as a police officer and satisfactorily
completes an approved recruit training program as required by this part. To
retain such certification, the constable shall also successfully complete an annual
in-service training session appropriate for the constable's responsibilities.
(2) A constable is not required to be certified by the POST commission to
perform the duties of a constable.
(3) The POST commission shall not require a constable to work a certain
number of hours in order to retain certification.
SECTION 2. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 8-10-104, is amended by deleting the
section and substituting instead:
(a) Each constable newly elected or appointed on or after July 1, 2025, must
complete one hundred twenty-eight (128) hours of training in law enforcement duties.
This training must be accomplished during the first year following election or
appointment.
SB1065
002928
- 1 -

(b) Prior to completing the required training, the constable must be paired with
another constable who has completed all training requirements or a POST-certified law
enforcement officer during the constable's official duties. This subsection (b) does not
apply to a constable who is elected or appointed within five (5) years of having served as
a full-time, POST-certified law enforcement officer.
(c) The one hundred twenty-eight-hour training requirement may be waived if the
officer successfully completes a comparable basic law enforcement course within one
(1) year of the date of election or appointment.
SECTION 3. This act takes effect upon becoming a law, the public welfare requiring it.
- 2 - 002928